Utah statutes.
41-6a-1644.   Diesel emissions program -- Implementation -- Monitoring -- Exemptions.

(1)  The legislative body of each county required by the comprehensive plan for air pollution control developed by the director of the Division of Air Quality in accordance with Subsection 19-2-107(2)(a)(i) to use an emissions opacity inspection and maintenance program for diesel-powered motor vehicles shall:

(a)  make regulations or ordinances to implement and enforce the requirement established by the Air Quality Board;

(b)  collect information about and monitor the program; and

(c)  by August 1 of each year, supply written information to the Department of Environmental Quality to identify program status.

(2)  The following vehicles are exempt from an emissions opacity inspection and maintenance program for diesel-powered motor vehicles established by a legislative body of a county under Subsection (1):

(a)  an implement of husbandry; and

(b)  a motor vehicle that:

(i)  meets the definition of a farm truck under Section 41-1a-102; and

(ii)  has a gross vehicle weight rating of 12,001 pounds or more.

(3) (a)  The legislative body of a county identified in Subsection (1) shall exempt a pickup truck, as defined in Section 41-1a-102, with a gross vehicle weight of 12,000 pounds or less from the emissions opacity inspection and maintenance program requirements of this section, if the registered owner of the pickup truck provides a signed statement to the legislative body stating the truck is used:

(i)  by the owner or operator of a farm located on property that qualifies as land in agricultural use under Sections 59-2-502 and 59-2-503; and

(ii)  exclusively for the following purposes in operating the farm:

(A)  for the transportation of farm products, including livestock and its products, poultry and its products, and floricultural and horticultural products; and

(B)  for the transportation of farm supplies, including tile, fence, and every other thing or commodity used in agricultural, floricultural, horticultural, livestock, and poultry production and maintenance.

(b)  The county shall provide to the registered owner who signs and submits a signed statement under this section a certificate of exemption from emissions opacity inspection and maintenance program requirements for purposes of registering the exempt vehicle.

